Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB732.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Classroom teacher user" means a certified teacher who a school district
identifies to the department as being employed primarily to provide
instruction to students and who is granted a user account on the online
commerce platform to make purchases from the online school supplies
vendor;
(b) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;
(c) "Online" means conducted electronically through the internet; and
(d) "Online school supplies vendor" means an online vendor that has been
selected by the department to provide school supplies to eligible classroom
teacher users under this section.
(2) The School Supplies for Kentucky Teachers Program is hereby established to
provide eligible classroom teacher users with financial and technical support in
purchasing school supplies for use in Kentucky's public schools and subject to
availability of funds for that purpose appropriated by the General Assembly.
(3) To implement the program, the Kentucky Board of Education shall:
(a) Adopt policies and promulgate administrative regulations necessary to:
1. Provide for the allocation and management of funds appropriated for
the program, the operation of the online commerce platform, and the
use by individual classroom teacher users;
2. Ensure that purchases made with program funds are restricted to only
purchases made by classroom teacher users from the program's online
school supplies vendors; and
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1575
3. Require each school district to report teachers who are eligible to be
classroom teacher users to the department for participation in the
program; and
(b) Direct the department to enter into one (1) or more contracts in accordance
with KRS Chapter 45A:
1. For the development and operation of a user-friendly online
commerce platform that:
a. Processes the allocation of funds to individual classroom teacher
user accounts for the online purchase of school supplies from an
online school supplies vendor;
b. Includes appropriate fiscal management and payment systems,
reporting tools, training tools, and other requirements identified
by the board;
c. Reports purchases made by a classroom teacher user to a school
or district administrator designated by the district; and
d. Provides technical assistance to public schools and classroom
teacher users on using the platform and identifying allowable
purchases from an online school supplies vendor; and
2. To select one (1) or more online school supplies vendors for the
program, the products that a vendor shall offer, and to establish a
price list for the products.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the School Supplies for Kentucky Teachers
Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed